translate/lexd/pron.lexd
фукаθ<pron>:все<pron>
хо<pron>:возвр_себя<pron>
хо-<pron>:возвр_себя<pron>
ху<pron>:возвр_себя<pron>
хӯ-<pron>:возвр_себя<pron>
хо<pron>:свой<pron>
хо-<pron>:свой<pron>
ху<pron>:свой<pron>
хӯ-<pron>:свой<pron>
ху̊ба<pron>:сам<pron>
ху̊баθ<pron>:сам<pron>
хӯ<pron>:вариант_местоимения_ху_при_стяжении<pron>
цадаθ<pron>:что<pron>
цади<pron>:что<pron>
ца-рāнг<pron>:какой<pron>
ца-ранг<pron>:какой<pron>
ца-рāнгин<pron>:какой<pron>
ца-рангин<pron>:какой<pron>
цу̊н<pron>:сколько<pron>
цу̊нд<pron>:сколько<pron>
цу̊н<pron>:несколько<pron>
цу̊нд<pron>:несколько<pron>
чанд<pron>:сколько<pron>
чанд<pron>:несколько<pron>
чандӣн<pron>:сколькото<pron>
чāй<pron>:прямая_форма_вопросительного_и_относительного_местоимения<pron>
чāй<pron>:кто<pron>
чāй<pron>:этот<pron>
чê<pron>:косвенная_форма_к_прямой_форме_вопросительного_местоимения_чй_кто<pron>
чê-т<pron>:косвенная_форма_к_прямой_форме_вопросительного_местоимения_чй_кто<pron>
чи<pron>:косвенная_форма_к_прямой_форме_вопросительного_местоимения_чй_кто<pron>
чи-ат<pron>:косвенная_форма_к_прямой_форме_вопросительного_местоимения_чй_кто<pron>
чӣ<pron>:косвенная_форма_к_прямой_форме_вопросительного_местоимения_чй_кто<pron>
чигӯнā<pron>:какой<pron>
чиду̊м<pron>:какой<pron>
чиду̊м<pron>:ктолибо<pron>
чӣ-<pron>:вариант_чи_при_стяжениях<pron>
чӣ<pron>:что<pron>
чӣз<pron>:что<pron>
чӣ<pron>:зачем<pron>
чӣз<pron>:зачем<pron>
чӣ<pron>:какой<pron>
чӣз<pron>:какой<pron>
чӣ<pron>:кто<pron>
чӣз<pron>:кто<pron>
чӣзак<pron>:что<pron>
чӣзик<pron>:что<pron>
чӣзик<pron>:какой<pron>
чӣзин<pron>:какой<pron>
чӣзо<pron>:все<pron>
чӣр<pron>:почему<pron>
чунӣн<pron>:так<pron>
йамик<pron>:уменьш_ласк_к_йам<pron>
йā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йик-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йикк-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
к-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
идик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ик-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
икк-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йидик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
к-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
мā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδен<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδен<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
ме<pron>:этих<pron>
мев<pron>:этих<pron>
мевен<pron>:этих<pron>
меф<pron>:этих<pron>
мефен<pron>:этих<pron>
мê-<pron>:его<pron>
ми<pron>:его<pron>
мӣ-<pron>:его<pron>
мê-<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении<pron>
ми<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении<pron>
мӣ-<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении<pron>
мê-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
ми<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
мӣ-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дê-<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
ди<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дӣ-<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дê-<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
ди<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дӣ-<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дê-<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
ди<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дӣ-<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_м_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
мо-<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
му<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
мӯ-<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
мо-<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
му<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
мӯ-<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
мо-<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
му<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
мӯ-<pron>:косв_ф_мест_го_л_ед_ч_к_wуз<pron>
там-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамā-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тама<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамайен<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
там-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамā-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тама<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамайен<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
то-<pron>:употребляется_адъективно<pron>
ту<pron>:употребляется_адъективно<pron>
тӯ-<pron>:употребляется_адъективно<pron>
то-<pron>:употребляется_в_выделительной_функции<pron>
ту<pron>:употребляется_в_выделительной_функции<pron>
тӯ-<pron>:употребляется_в_выделительной_функции<pron>
ту-рд<pron>:тебе<pron>
ту-нд<pron>:у_тебя<pron>
тӯ-нд<pron>:у_тебя<pron>
фук<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
ач<pron>:скольконибудь<pron>
ар-гу̊н<pron>:как_только<pron>
ар-рāнг<pron>:всякого_рода<pron>
ар-тāн<pron>:всякий<pron>
аред<pron>:здесь<pron>
аргиз<pron>:никогда<pron>
ару̊д<pron>:здесь<pron>
бāзи<pron>:некоторые<pron>
ца<pron>:что_как<pron>
чиду̊м<pron>:какой<pron>
чӣр<pron>:что<pron>
цу̊нд<pron>:сколько<pron>
кā<pron>:куда_где<pron>
кāд<pron>:куда_где<pron>
миф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_к_прямой_форме_m<pron>
муф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_к_прямой_форме_m<pron>
мим<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_ж_р_к_прямой_форме_yim<pron>
мум<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_ж_р_к_прямой_форме_yim<pron>
ар<pron>:каждый<pron>
ту<pron>:ты<pron>
тӯ<pron>:ты<pron>
им<pron>:с_усилительн_частицей_kim_р_im_прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_ед_ч_ближней_степени<pron>
йим<pron>:с_усилительн_частицей_kim_р_im_прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_ед_ч_ближней_степени<pron>
йим<pron>:с_усилительн_частицей_kim_р_im_прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_ед_ч_ближней_степени<pron>
мāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_мн_ч_ближней_степени<pron>
муф<pron>:прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_мн_ч_ближней_степени<pron>
миф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_к_прямой_форме_m<pron>
муф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_к_прямой_форме_m<pron>
миф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_к_прямой_форме_m<pron>
муф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_ближней_степени_к_прямой_форме_m<pron>
wуф<pron>:<pron>
уф<pron>:<pron>
уф<pron>:<pron>
wуф<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
уф<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
уф<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
wуф<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
уф<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
уф<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
wуф<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
уф<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
уф<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
wуф<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_гл_прош_вр<pron>
уф<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_гл_прош_вр<pron>
уф<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_гл_прош_вр<pron>
wуф<pron>:употр_в_роли_суффикса_особого_мн_ч<pron>
уф<pron>:употр_в_роли_суффикса_особого_мн_ч<pron>
уф<pron>:употр_в_роли_суффикса_особого_мн_ч<pron>
wум<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_дальней_степени_ж_р_к_прямой_форме_y<pron>
ум<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_дальней_степени_ж_р_к_прямой_форме_y<pron>
ум<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_дальней_степени_ж_р_к_прямой_форме_y<pron>
wум<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
ум<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
ум<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
wум<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
ум<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
ум<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
wум<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
ум<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
ум<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
wум<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_гл_прош_вр<pron>
ум<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_гл_прош_вр<pron>
ум<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_гл_прош_вр<pron>
уа<pron>:употр_в_функции_подлежащего<pron>
уа<pron>:употр_при_подлежащем_в_адъективной_функции<pron>
уа<pron>:с_усилительн_частицей_k_прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_дальней_степени<pron>
йид<pron>:употр_в_функции_подлежащего<pron>
йид<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_подлежащем<pron>
йид<pron>:с_усилительн_частицей_kid_р_id_прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_ед_числа_средней_степени_удаления<pron>
йим<pron>:употр_в_функции_подлежащего<pron>
йим<pron>:употр_при_подлежащем_в_адъективной_функции<pron>
мун<pron>:с_послелогом_ri_mu_р_mu_косв_форма_местоимения_го_л_ед_ч_к_прямой_форме_аz<pron>
мун<pron>:с_послелогом_ri_mu_р_mu_косв_форма_местоимения_го_л_ед_ч_к_прямой_форме_аz<pron>
аȥед<pron>:см_azd<pron>
аȥендер<pron>:см_azd<pron>
āз<pron>:прямая_форма_местоимения_го_л_ед_ч_я<pron>
аз<pron>:прямая_форма_местоимения_го_л_ед_ч_я<pron>
ȥӣ<pron>:такой<pron>
аȥӣ<pron>:такой<pron>
азӣ<pron>:такой<pron>
зӣ<pron>:такой<pron>
са<pron>:что_как_какой_почему<pron>
цав<pron>:что<pron>
цонд<pron>:сколько<pron>
цондā<pron>:о_большом_количестве<pron>
чāй<pron>:кто<pron>
чӣ<pron>:кто<pron>
ар-чӣ<pron>:всякий<pron>
чидом<pron>:какой_который<pron>
чидом<pron>:какой_который<pron>
чидум<pron>:какой_который<pron>
ар-чидум<pron>:каждый<pron>
чиз<pron>:чтото<pron>
чӣз<pron>:чтото<pron>
йи-ц̌из<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
ар-чиз<pron>:всякий<pron>
ар-чиз-аθ<pron>:всякий<pron>
чиз-ри<pron>:почему_зачем_ради_чего<pron>
ар-чор<pron>:каждый<pron>
амаги<pron>:все<pron>
амагӣ<pron>:все<pron>
фук<pron>:<pron>
фукаθ<pron>:<pron>
ам-дигар<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
дāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указательн_местоимения_мн_ч_средней_степени_удаления_употр_в_функции_подлежащего<pron>
дāδ<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_подлежащем<pron>
дас<pron>:так<pron>
дай<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_средней_степени_удаления_ед_ч_к_прямой_форме_id<pron>
дӣ<pron>:косв_форма_указательн_местоимения_средней_степени_удаления_ед_ч_к_прямой_форме_id<pron>
дай<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
дӣ<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
дай<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_глаголах_прош_вр<pron>
дӣ<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_глаголах_прош_вр<pron>
дай<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
дӣ<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
дай<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходным_гл_прош_вр<pron>
дӣ<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходным_гл_прош_вр<pron>
дӣ-ту̊р-аθ<pron>:так<pron>
ик-дӣ-ту̊р<pron>:так<pron>
ик-дӣ-ту̊р-аθ<pron>:так<pron>
диф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_средней_степени_удаления_к_прямой_форме_d<pron>
дуф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указательн_местоимения_средней_степени_удаления_к_прямой_форме_d<pron>
диф<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
дуф<pron>:употр_в_субстантивных_функциях<pron>
диф<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
дуф<pron>:в_функции_подлежащего_при_переходных_гл_прош_вр<pron>
диф<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
дуф<pron>:употр_в_адъективной_функции_при_существительных<pron>
диф<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_глаг_прош_вр<pron>
дуф<pron>:при_подлежащем_с_переходными_глаг_прош_вр<pron>
дига<pron>:больше_не<pron>
дигар<pron>:больше_не<pron>
